Utah statutes.
10-6-128.   Amendment and increase of individual fund budgets.

After the conclusion of the hearing, the governing body, by resolution or ordinance, may amend the budgets of the funds proposed to be increased, so as to make all or part of the increases therein, both estimated revenues and appropriations, which were the proper subject of consideration at the hearing. Final amendments in the current period to the budgets of any of the funds set forth in Section 10-6-109 shall be adopted by the governing body on or before the last day of the fiscal period.



Amended by Chapter 300, 1999 General Session

